California statutes. Insurance Code
At the time and place specified in the notice and order to show cause, the commissioner shall hold a hearing at which the possessor of a certificate of exemption may present evidence to show that it is not violating any applicable provision of this code, and that it is operating in conformity with the documents which were filed as a basis for the certificate of exemption. If after the hearing the commissioner finds the evidence shows that the operations of the person are in violation of any of the applicable provisions of this code, or are in violation of the documents upon which its application for certificate of exemption was based, the commissioner shall revoke the certificate of exemption and the person whose certificate of exemption is thus revoked shall cease the transaction of life and disability insurance until it procures a new certificate of exemption or a certificate of authority under other provisions of this code.

This article does not prevent the commissioner from acting and bringing proceedings under Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, if grounds exist for the institution of such proceedings with respect to any person transacting life or disability insurance either with or without a certificate of exemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 86.)
-------------------------------------------

10500.

Every person not expressly exempted by the provisions of this code that transacts life or disability insurance without a valid and unrevoked certificate of authority or without a valid and unrevoked certificate of exemption issued pursuant to this article is guilty of a misdemeanor. Every employee, officer, or agent of any person who knowingly assists any person in the transaction of insurance in violation of the provisions of this code, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 87.)
-------------------------------------------

10501.

Any person subject to this article who upon January 1, 1943, was paying, allowing, or promising to pay benefits in the event of death or disability, or otherwise transacting life or disability insurance without a valid and unrevoked certificate of authority so to do, may apply for a certificate of exemption under this article.

After filing such application, or if such application has heretofore been filed, such person may continue to transact such insurance until the application is denied or such certificate of exemption is issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

10505.

(a) A labor union having all of the following characteristics is exempt from the provisions of this code relating to life and disability insurance in respect to the benefits herein specified and transactions connected therewith: 

(1) It is organized for the purpose of collective bargaining concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or conditions of work and for the mutual benefit of its members and not for profit.

(2) Either (A) it does not issue policies but provides
 for payment of those benefits in its bylaws, constitution, or rules and regulations; or (B) it is composed of members of one craft or industry or allied craft or industries.

(3) The payment of those benefits is incidental to the purposes of that union. 

(b) Any incorporated organization, the membership and insurance in which are restricted to members of that labor union and the officers of which are members of the labor union, is likewise exempt from this code to the same extent as that labor union.

(c) Any organization described in either subdivision (a) or (b) is also exempt from all provisions of this code relating to insurance protecting against wage losses from any cause in respect to the benefits promised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 582, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10505.1.

(a) (1) Any nonprofit cooperative assessment association, the membership and insurance in which are restricted to members of a labor union, is exempt from the provisions of this code relating to the supervision or regulation of insurance with respect to the provision of job protection benefits, including any accidental death benefits, to its members. A nonprofit cooperative assessment association established pursuant to this section is not, and shall not be, a member of the California Insurance Guarantee Association under Article 14.2 (commencing with Section 1063) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, or any other insurance guaranty association in this state.

(2) Each policy issued in this state pursuant to this section shall contain, in at least 10-point typeface on the front page and the declaration page, the following notice:
“NOTICEThis policy is issued by a nonprofit cooperative assessment association that is not subject to CALIFORNIA insurance laws and regulation and is not admitted in California. California insurance guaranty funds are not available for your nonprofit cooperative assessment association.”
(b) “Job protection insurance” means the business of providing indemnity to conductors, engineers, motormen, brakemen, switchmen, firemen, dispatchers, clerks, operators, trackmen, signalmen, and maintenance of way personnel of steam and electric railways and to busdrivers and
 truckdrivers employed by common carriers for loss of position arising from discharge or suspension, which indemnity is payable in installments that do not exceed the average monthly wage of the insured. “Job protection insurance” may include accidental death coverage insuring the member. Nothing in this section is intended to regulate or define any benefit delivery system which provides indemnity, as defined in this section, in any manner other than the sale of insurance. Labor unions providing the type of indemnity defined in this section, shall be expressly exempt from any regulation by any state agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 362, Sec. 5.   (AB 2734)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Pension Funds, Separate Accounts [10506. - 10506.5.]

10506.

(a) Any domestic life insurance company may, after adoption of a resolution by its board of directors, allocate to one or more separate accounts, in accordance with the terms of a written agreement, any amounts which are paid to the company in connection with a pension, retirement, retirement medical benefits, or profit-sharing plan, or program for one or more persons, or with an individual or group variable life insurance policy, and which are to be, or may be, applied in payment or in making provision for payment of proceeds or benefits
 under the company’s policies, contracts, or agreements of retirement benefits, and other benefits incidental thereto, in fixed or variable dollar amounts, or both. The income, if any, and gains or losses, realized or unrealized, on each account shall be credited to or charged against the amount allocated to the account in accordance with the agreement, without regard to the other income, gains or losses of the company. The amounts allocated to the accounts and accumulations thereon, by any life insurance company shall be invested and reinvested as specified in the policy, contract, or agreement without regard to any requirements or limitations prescribed by the laws of this state governing the investments of insurance companies, provided that the amounts allocated to separate accounts for which the insurer has issued guarantees of benefits as to dollar amount and duration or of funds as to all or part of the principal amount thereof or stated rate of interest, and the accumulations thereon pursuant to
 Section 10506.4, shall be invested in the types of investments permitted to life insurance companies for investments held in the insurer’s general account as described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1170), Article 4 (commencing with Section 1190), and Article 4.6 (commencing with Section 1211) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 1 (excluding Section 1212 thereof), except that the approved method of operations and applicable policy, contract, or agreement provisions shall govern the amount of these investments held in the separate account. However, with regard to variable life insurance separate accounts and accumulations thereon, the separate accounts shall have sufficient net investment income and readily marketable assets to meet anticipated obligations under policies funded by the account. The limitations contained in Sections 1192.4 and 1198 are not applicable to these investments. These investments shall not be included in determining the propriety of other investments of the company. The
 liability of the company with respect thereto, but only to the extent prescribed in the agreement, shall be shown on the statement of the company in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. Amounts allocated by an insurance company to separate accounts in the exercise of the power granted by this section shall be owned by the company, but shall not be chargeable with liabilities arising out of any other business the company may conduct except and to the extent provided in the policy, contract, or agreement. The company shall not hold itself out to be a trustee in respect to these amounts.

(b) In addition to amounts otherwise allocated to separate accounts, a domestic life insurer may allocate to the account or accounts amounts which otherwise would be subject to investment in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 1190) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 1. The aggregate of these additional amounts shall not, however, exceed 1
 percent of its admitted assets as of the preceding December 31, or 5 percent of the excess of its admitted assets over its liabilities and required reserves as of the preceding December 31, whichever is the smaller. The company shall be entitled to withdraw at any time, in whole or in part, its participation in any separate account to which funds have been allocated as provided in this subdivision and to receive, upon withdrawal, its proportionate share of the value of the assets of the separate account at the time of withdrawal.

(c) In addition to the allocations to separate accounts provided for in subdivision (a), a domestic insurer may, at the request of a policyholder or contractholder or the beneficiary of a policy or contract, allocate to any separate account or accounts, death payments, proceeds of matured endowments, dividends, or surrender values.

(d) Except as otherwise
 provided in Section 10506.4, or with the approval of the commissioner, and under conditions as to investments and other matters as he or she may prescribe, which shall recognize the guaranteed nature of the benefits provided, reserves for (1) benefits guaranteed as to dollar amount and duration and (2) funds guaranteed as to principal amount or stated rate of interest shall not be maintained in a separate account that, as provided under applicable policy, contract, or agreement, is or is not chargeable with liabilities arising out of any other business the company may conduct.

(e) Unless otherwise approved by the commissioner, assets allocated to a separate account shall be valued at their market value, or at amortized cost if it approximates market value within the limits and constraints imposed by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, on the date of valuation, or, if there is no readily available market, then as provided under
 the terms of the contract or the rules or other written agreement applicable to the separate account. Unless otherwise approved by the commissioner, the portion of any of the assets of the separate account equal to the company’s reserve liability, with regard to the guaranteed benefits and funds referred to in subdivision (d), shall be valued in accordance with the rules otherwise applicable to the company’s assets.

(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), a sale, exchange, or other transfer of assets may not be made by a company between any of its separate accounts, or between any other of its investment accounts and one or more of its separate accounts unless, in case of a transfer into a separate account, the transfer is made solely to establish the account or to support the operation of the contracts with respect to the separate account to which the transfer is made, and unless the transfer,
 whether into or from a separate account is made (1) by a transfer of cash, or (2) by a transfer of securities having a readily determinable market value, and the transfer of securities is approved by the commissioner. The commissioner may approve other transfers among the accounts if, in his or her opinion, the transfer would not be inequitable.

(2) Transfers from an insurer’s general account to one or more of its separate accounts to establish and maintain reserves for the guarantees authorized by Section 10506.4 shall only be made in cash in accordance with methods of operations approved pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10506.4. A transfer shall not operate to increase the amounts permitted to be allocated by an insurer to the separate accounts pursuant to this subdivision or by subdivision (b) of Section 10506, and the provisions of that subdivision shall not limit these transfers.

(g) Any domestic life insurance company which establishes one or more separate accounts pursuant to this section may provide for special voting rights and procedures for participants in the separate account relating to investment policy, investment advisory services, and selection of certified public accountants in relation to the administration of the assets in any separate account. The voting rights shall be in addition to, and shall not affect, voting rights of mutual insurers.

(h) The purpose and intent of this section is to permit the issuance and delivery of policies or contracts, in connection with a pension, retirement, retirement medical benefits, or profit-sharing plan, or program for one or more persons, or policies of variable life insurance, providing for the payment of benefits in fixed or variable amounts, or both, and the establishment of separate accounts by domestic companies for the administration of and
 investments under these agreements. To protect the public and policyholders located in this state from hazardous operation by domestic and foreign companies, and to further the purpose and provision of this section, no domestic or foreign life insurance company shall undertake the issuance of any contract providing for variable benefits until the company has satisfied the commissioner that its condition or method of operation in connection with the issuance of these contracts shall not be such as would render its operation hazardous to the public or its policyholders in this state and, in the case of a foreign or alien insurer, that it meets the conditions prescribed in Section 716, for the issuance of a certificate of authority. In determining the qualification of a company requesting authority to issue contracts providing for variable benefits within this state, the commissioner shall consider among other things, (1) the history of the company; (2) the character, responsibility, and general fitness of the
 officers and directors of the company; (3) the regulation of a foreign company by its state of domicile; (4) the adequacy of the investment management which the company is providing; and (5) the company’s arrangements for the supervision of the marketing of the contracts. Subsequent to an insurer initially satisfying the commissioner that its condition or method of operation would not render its operation hazardous to the public or its policyholders, the insurer shall notify the commissioner at any time it implements a material change respecting the mutual funds underlying the variable contract separate account available or to be available with a policy or contract providing variable benefits. The notification shall prominently disclose the sales charges, management and other fees payable to the insurer under the contract, and whether one or more of the mutual funds underlying the variable contract separate account are issued by an affiliated company and the names of those mutual funds. The notification
 shall be accompanied by a certification signed by an executive officer having responsibility for contracts providing variable benefits stating that the change complies with relevant statutes and regulations. The commissioner may review the notification to ensure the continued qualification of the insurer to issue and deliver those policies and contracts. The commissioner may make reasonable rules and regulations as he or she considers necessary, proper, and advisable concerning the issuance and delivery of these policies and contracts and the payment of benefits thereunder and the manner in which the separate accounts shall be administered and which types of policies and contracts, if any, shall be subject to his or her approval prior to issue. Notification of any material change shall not be subject to the commissioner’s approval or acknowledgment prior to implementation. The commissioner shall promulgate on an emergency basis, and in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure
 Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), a regulation superseding Insurance Department Bulletin 97-2 that shall become effective January 1, 2003. Until promulgation of the regulation, the commissioner and insurers may continue to rely upon Insurance Department Bulletin 97-2, except that the commissioner’s approval or acknowledgment prior to implementation of a change to a mutual fund underlying a variable contract separate account shall not be required on or after January 1, 2003.

However, no company may provide variable benefits in its contracts unless it is an admitted insurer having and maintaining a combined capital and surplus of at least ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

For purposes of this section, “affiliated company” has the same meaning given in paragraph (1) of subsection (g) of Section 6701 of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(i) (1) Any contract providing benefits payable in variable amounts delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after the effective date of the amendments to this section enacted at the 1971 Regular Session of the Legislature shall contain a statement of the essential features of the procedures to be followed by an insurance company in determining the dollar amount of these variable benefits. Any contract under which the benefits vary to reflect investment experience, including a group contract and any certificate in evidence of variable benefits issued thereunder, shall state that the dollar amount shall so vary, and shall contain on its first page a statement to the effect that the benefits thereunder are on a variable basis. Except for Article 3a (commencing with Section 10159.1) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2, in the case of a variable life insurance policy, and except as otherwise provided in this section,
 all pertinent provisions of this code shall apply to separate accounts and contracts relating thereto. Any variable life insurance contract, delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after the effective date of the amendments to this section enacted at the 1992 Regular Session of the Legislature, shall contain such nonforfeiture provisions as are appropriate to such a contract.

(2) The reserve liability for variable contracts shall be established in accordance with actuarial procedures that recognize the variable nature of the benefits provided and any mortality guarantees.

(j) No insurer shall issue anywhere any group variable life insurance policy for which the master contractholder or any covered party is an individual residing in this state or is a corporation, association, trust, or other legal entity that is either domiciled in or has its principal place of
 business in this state, unless the insurer has become qualified to issue variable life insurance policies and its group master policy form together with all forms of certificates or notices thereunder have been approved by the commissioner. Group variable life insurance policies shall be issued only to groups referred to in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10200) of Part 2 of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 347, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.1.

The commissioner shall require the payment of two thousand eight hundred twenty-three dollars ($2,823), as a fee for the determination of qualification required by Section 10506. Upon completion of the determination of qualification, and, whether authorization to issue contracts providing variable benefits is granted or denied, the commissioner shall require the payment by domestic insurers of those additional amounts from the requesting domestic insurer as may be necessary to defray all administrative costs in excess of eight hundred forty-nine dollars ($849) incurred by the commissioner in making that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 62.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.2.

(a) The commissioner shall require the payment in advance of two thousand eight hundred twenty-three dollars ($2,823), as a fee for the examination and analysis of documents required by law to be filed with the commissioner by domestic or foreign insurers in connection with changes to an application and qualification to write variable contracts.

(b) The commissioner shall require the payment in advance of seven hundred twenty-six dollars ($726), as a fee for the review, examination, and analysis of documents required to be filed by insurers issuing variable life insurance policies.

(c) The commissioner shall require the payment in advance of three thousand six
 hundred eighteen dollars ($3,618), as a fee for the examination and analysis involved in approving transfers of assets pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 10506.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 63.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.3.

(a) The commissioner shall adopt appropriate administrative regulations governing modified guaranteed annuities. Modified guaranteed annuities shall be subject to Article 3b (commencing with Section 10168) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 with regard to nonforfeiture values computed under the terms of the annuity but excluding from the computation the effect of market-value adjustment factors.

(b) Group annuities exempted under Section 10168 are also exempted from any
 modified guaranteed annuity regulations.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall be retroactive to January 1, 1987, to the extent the assets underlying such group contracts have not been maintained in a separate account.

(d) The commissioner shall issue a bulletin, on or before July 1, 1987, setting forth conditions under which variable life insurance may be issued, or issued for delivery, in this state as permitted by Chapter 731 of the Statutes of 1984.

Upon issuance of the bulletin, regulations regarding variable life insurance contained in Article 11.1 (commencing with Section 2534) of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations shall be of no force and effect as long as the bulletin is effective. The bulletin authorized by this section shall have the same force and effect, and may be enforced by the commissioner to the same extent and degree,
 as the regulations superseded by it until the time that the commissioner may make additional or amended regulations as provided by subdivision (h) of Section 10506.

On or before July 1, 1993, the commissioner may amend the existing bulletin to include reasonable provisions relating to requirements for group variable life insurance. Notwithstanding the foregoing authority to issue a bulletin and prior to its issuance, the commissioner shall approve group master policy forms and certificates and notices related thereto that reasonably comply with the general provisions set forth in Sections 10506 to 10506.2, inclusive, and any other applicable statutes or regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 984, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.4.

(a) An admitted life insurer that is financially qualified pursuant to subdivision (b) and complies with the provisions of this section and those of Section 10506 that expressly refer to this section or are not inconsistent with it, may guarantee, pursuant to an approved policy, contract, or agreement, the value of the assets allocated to a separate account, which as provided under the applicable policy, contract, or agreement is not chargeable with liabilities arising out of any other business the company may conduct, or the investment
 results thereof, or the income thereon, or the benefits payable pursuant to the approved policy, contract, or agreement, and may transfer to the separate account cash to maintain its reserves for those guarantees pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 10506. The general account of the insurer shall be paid reasonable and sufficient compensation not less frequently than quarterly, for risks and other expenses incurred, from any separate account that receives a guarantee authorized by this section.

(b) For the purposes of this section “approved policy, contract, or agreement” means a policy, contract, or agreement, the form of which has been approved by the commissioner, for issue or marketing in this state, and which in addition to meeting the requirements of all pertinent provisions of this code, meets the requirements of one of the following paragraphs:

(1) A
 policy, contract, or agreement meets the requirements of this paragraph if it satisfies and is expected to satisfy over the full life of the policy, contract, or agreement all of the following conditions:

(A) The weighted asset valuation reserve factor for the assets held in the separate account pursuant to the terms of the policy, contract, or agreement shall not exceed 2 percent.

(B) Guarantees of interest that extend beyond 14 months at any time shall be no greater than 3 percent per annum.

(C) Any reserves required because the contract value is less than the reserves required for the policy, contract, or agreement shall be maintained in a separate identified segment of the insurer’s general account or otherwise segregated within the general account, or be held in a separate account all of the assets of which
 shall also be chargeable with liabilities arising out of other business of the insurer.

(D) In the event the policy, contract, or agreement provides for withdrawals (other than those resulting from an election by a participant under a pension, retirement, retirement medical benefit, or profit-sharing plan) of amounts other than on the conversion date or guarantee effective date, if any, the withdrawals shall be made in either of the following manners:

(i) In a lump sum in an amount not to exceed the market value.

(ii) In one or more contract value installments the present value of which is equal to or less than the market value of the aggregate withdrawal.

(2) A policy, contract, or agreement meets the requirements of this paragraph if it satisfies and
 is expected to satisfy over the full life of the policy, contract, or agreement all of the following conditions:

(A) The weighted asset valuation reserve factor for the assets held in the separate account pursuant to the terms of the policy, contract, or agreement shall not exceed 4 percent.

(B) The market value of the assets held in the separate account plus any reserves described in subparagraph (C) shall exceed the current aggregate liabilities determined by discounting the guaranteed benefit liability cashflows at the rate of 105 percent of the then current yields as quoted on United States Government issued securities having substantially similar maturities by at least the following applicable amount:

(i) For assets consisting of debt instruments, an amount equal to the asset valuation reserve “maximum reserve
 factor,” provided, however, that the factor shall be reduced by 50 percent for the purpose of this calculation if the difference in durations of the assets and liabilities (as confirmed in the actuarial statement referred to in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d)) are one year or less.

(ii) For assets that are not debt instruments, 20 percent.

(C) Any reserves required because the contract value is less than the reserves required for the policy, contract, or agreement shall be maintained in a separate identified segment of the insurer’s general account or otherwise segregated within the general account, or be held in a separate account all of the assets of which shall also be chargeable with liabilities arising out of other business of the insurer.

(D) In the event the policy, contract, or agreement
 provides for withdrawals (other than those resulting from an election by a participant under a pension, retirement, retirement medical benefit, or profit-sharing plan) of amounts other than on the conversion date or guarantee effective date, if any, the withdrawals shall be made in either of the following manners:

(i) In a lump sum in an amount not to exceed the market value.

(ii) In one or more contract value installments the present value of which is equal to or less than the market value of the aggregate withdrawal.

(3) A policy, contract, or agreement meets the requirements of this paragraph if it satisfies and is expected to satisfy over the full life of the policy, contract, or agreement all of the following conditions:

(A) The guarantees
 contained in the policy, contract, or agreement applicable to the value of the assets held in the separate account by the insurer shall be based upon a publicly available interest rate series or an index of the aggregate market value of a group of publicly traded financial instruments, the interest rate series or index to be specified in the policy, contract, or agreement.

(B) Assets held in the separate account and the accumulations thereon shall be invested in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 10506 applicable to policies, contracts, or agreements governed by this section and shall comply with all of the following:

(i) Interest-bearing bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be publicly traded or meet applicable requirements of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission enabling the securities to be publicly traded.

(ii) Investments in capital stock shall be traded on an exchange regulated by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, and investments in any futures contracts with respect thereto shall be traded on an exchange regulated under the Commodities Exchange Act (Title 7, United States Code).

(iii) Issuers of interest-bearing obligations held in the separate account must be rated by an independent nationally recognized financial rating agency approved by the commissioner or by the Securities Valuation Office of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(iv) With respect to any investments in shares of investment companies registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1 et seq.) the assets of the entity must qualify as investments directly allowed for separate accounts
 pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 10506 applicable to policies, contracts, or agreements governed by this section.

(v) The type, quality, industry diversification, prepayment characteristics, expected duration, and other factors pertaining to investments shall be set forth in the approved method of operations which shall contain a demonstration satisfactory to the commissioner that the investments are likely to achieve the performance of the applicable index or interest rate series.

(C) The period between the commencement date of the guaranty of the value of the assets held in the separate account and the conversion date, if any, shall not exceed five years.

(D) Any reserves required because the contract value is less than the reserves required for the policy, contract, or agreement shall be
 maintained in a separate identified segment of the insurer’s general account or otherwise segregated within the general account, or be held in a separate account all of the assets of which shall also be chargeable with liabilities arising out of other business of the insurer.

(E) In the event the policy, contract, or agreement provides for withdrawals (other than those resulting from an election by a participant under a pension, retirement, retirement medical benefit, or profit-sharing plan) of amounts other than on the conversion date or guarantee effective date, if any, the withdrawals shall be made in either of the following manners:

(i) In a lump sum in an amount not to exceed the market value.

(ii) In one or more contract value installments the present value of which is equal to or less than the market value of
 the aggregate withdrawal.

(4) For the purposes of this section, “conversion date” means the date, if any, specified in the policy, contract, or agreement upon which the assets held pursuant to it shall be converted or applied to the purchase of annuities or returned to the owner of the policy, contract, or agreement, or its designee.

(5) For the purposes of this section, the “asset valuation reserve factor” for each asset will be determined by the application of the asset valuation reserve factor, “maximum reserve factor,” as contained in the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) Life, Accident and Health Annual Statement Instructions (Instructions) and Valuation of Securities Manual, or if not contained therein, an asset valuation reserve factor of 20 percent shall be assigned. To determine the weighted asset valuation reserve factor, the asset valuation reserve
 factor shall be applied to the market value of each asset.

(6) For the purposes of this section, “market value” means the policy, contract, or agreement’s proportionate share of the actual market value of the separate account at the time of withdrawal or if the determination of market value is by formula, the formula shall be set forth in the policy, contract, or agreement and shall be designed to closely match actual market value.

(7) For the purposes of this section, “guarantee effective date” means the date guarantees authorized by this section may result in payments from the general account to the separate account.

(c) No admitted life insurer may issue or market in this state, nor may any domestic life insurer issue or market anywhere, a policy, contract, or agreement, or coverage thereunder by certificate or
 otherwise, which contains the guarantees referred to in subdivision (a) unless both of the following apply:

(1) It has received from the commissioner authority to issue policies or contracts providing for the payment of variable benefits pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 10506.

(2) The commissioner has determined after application by the insurer in the form and content as the commissioner may require, review of the insurer’s applicable proposed method of operations relating to policies, contracts, or agreements containing the guarantees authorized by subdivision (a), payment of fees specified in Section 736 and consideration of the matters set forth in subdivision (h) of Section 10506, that the insurer is financially qualified to issue policies, contracts, or agreements that contain the guarantees referred to in subdivision (a) including by meeting or exceeding the financial
 standards in subdivision (d).

(d) (1) No admitted life insurer that has been financially qualified pursuant to subdivision (c) may issue or market or continue to issue or market in this state, nor may any domestic life insurer issue or market anywhere or continue to issue or market anywhere, policies, contracts, or agreements, or coverage thereunder by certificate or otherwise, providing the guarantees referred to in subdivision (a) unless all of the following apply:

(A) It has at least one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) of admitted assets or at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of aggregate capital and surplus.

(B) It annually complies with the requirement to furnish an actuarial statement as a part of or in addition to the statement required by Section 10489.15, provided the
 actuarial statement is in form and substance satisfactory to the commissioner. This actuarial statement shall meet all the following requirements:

(i) The statement shall state that, after taking into account risk charges payable from the assets of the separate account with respect to the guarantee, the assets of the separate account, together with any reserves in excess of the account value, make good and sufficient provision for the liabilities of the insurer with respect thereto.

(ii) The statement shall provide an opinion of the reasonableness and sufficiency of the pricing of any general account guarantees and any other fees for administration paid to the general account from the separate account.

(iii) The statement shall be supported by a memorandum by a qualified actuary, also in form and substance
 satisfactory to the commissioner, that describes the calculations made in support of the actuarial statement and includes the assumptions used in the calculations.

(C) Its ratio of aggregate capital and surplus to its aggregate liabilities is not lower than 75 percent of that ratio as of the December 31 prior to its receiving financial qualification from the commissioner except as allowed under paragraph (4) of subdivision (d).

For the purposes of this section, “capital and surplus” includes capital and surplus plus the asset valuation reserve and one-half of the liability for dividends, all as reflected on the most recent financial statement on file with the commissioner. “Liabilities” means the total liabilities as reflected on the financial statement excluding therefrom liabilities for policies, contracts, and agreements issued in connection with separate accounts, liabilities in connection with
 contracts issued pursuant to this section and excluding both of the following:

(i) The liability for any asset valuation reserve.

(ii) One-half the liability for dividends.

(2) If the commissioner, following notice to the insurer and a hearing, determines that an insurer that has received financial qualification pursuant to subdivision (c) no longer maintains the financial strength needed to initially receive the qualification, the commissioner may issue an order requiring the insurer to cease issuing new policies, contracts, or agreements providing for guarantees contemplated by subdivision (a).

(3) In the event an insurer that has received financial qualification pursuant to subdivision (c) determines that it does not meet the requirements of
 subdivision (d), it shall promptly comply with paragraph (2) as if an order had been issued by the commissioner after notice and hearing, and within 45 days, notify the commissioner in writing at the place designated by the commissioner that it has ceased to meet the requirements specified in the written notice.
